California, session 20252026, SB156.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7926.300 of the Government Code is amended to read:7926.300. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, information regarding persons paid by the state to provide in-home supportive services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.95, 14132.952, 14132.956, or 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and information about persons who have completed the form described in subdivision (a) of Section 12305.81 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for the provider enrollment process, is not subject to public disclosure pursuant to this division, except as provided in subdivision (b).(b) (1) Copies of names, addresses, home telephone numbers, personal cellular telephone numbers, written or spoken languages, if known, and personal email addresses of persons described in subdivision (a) shall be made available, upon request, to an exclusive bargaining agent and to any labor organization seeking representation rights pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12301.6, or Section 12302.5, of the Welfare and Institutions Code or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4. This information shall not be used by the receiving entity for any purpose other than the employee organizing, representation, and assistance activities of the labor organization.(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code, and if the State Department of Social Services determines it is necessary to avoid disruption to payroll processes, including deductions, banking information, subject to a data sharing agreement, may be provided to the payment processing contractor of the recognized employee organization only for persons described in subdivision (a) who have signed a membership agreement authorizing such disclosure.(c) This section applies solely to individuals who provide services under the In-Home Supportive Services Program (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), the Personal Care Services Program pursuant to Section 14132.95 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the In-Home Supportive Services Plus Option Program pursuant to Section 14132.952 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the Community First Choice Option Program pursuant to Section 14132.956 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or the Waiver Personal Care Services Program pursuant to Section 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(d) This section does not alter the rights of parties under the Meyers-Milias-Brown Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4) or any other labor relations law.SEC. 2. Section 20508.4 is added to the Government Code, to read:20508.4. A successor agency, pursuant to Section 20508, for the Humboldt No. 1 Fire Protection District and City of Eureka Fire Department may provide employees the defined benefit plan or formula that those employees received from their respective employer prior to the annexation. This section is applicable to all employees of the Humboldt No. 1 Fire Protection District who were employed at the time of annexation and remain employed at the successor agency on January 1, 2026.SEC. 3. Section 20825.19 is added to the Government Code, to read:20825.19. (a) (1) In addition to the appropriation required pursuant to Section 20814, the Legislature hereby appropriates three hundred seventy-two million dollars ($372,000,000) from the General Fund, for the purposes described in subclause (IV) of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution to supplement the state’s appropriation to the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund. The appropriation made by this section represents a portion of the amount identified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 35.50 of the Budget Act of 2025. The appropriation shall be consistent with the requirements of this section and at the direction of the Department of Finance. The Department of Finance shall provide to the Controller a schedule establishing the timing of specific transfers to be used as described in subdivision (b).(2) The supplemental payment to the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund described in paragraph (1) shall be apportioned to the following state employee member categories, as directed by the Department of Finance, not to exceed the following amounts:(A) One hundred seventy-four million five hundred twenty-three thousand dollars ($174,523,000) to the state miscellaneous member category.(B) Ten million two hundred ninety-six thousand dollars ($10,296,000) to the state industrial member category.(C) Twenty million four hundred seventy-nine thousand dollars ($20,479,000) to the state safety member category.(D) One hundred sixty-six million seven hundred two thousand dollars ($166,702,000) to the state peace officer/firefighter member category.(b) The appropriation made in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be applied to the unfunded state liabilities for the state employee member categories described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) that are in excess of the base amounts for the 2025–26 fiscal year.SEC. 4. Section 53270 of the Government Code is amended to read:53270. (a) The Legislature hereby finds that the hiring of permanent career civilian federal, state, and local government firefighters by local agencies as specified in this section is in need of uniform statewide regulation and constitutes a matter of statewide concern that shall be governed solely by this section.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon approval by its governing body, a local government, including, but not limited to, a fire protection district, joint powers agency, or the fire department of a city, including a charter city, county, or city and county, or any political subdivision of one of these agencies, when hiring additional firefighters, may appoint as a member or officer any person who meets all of the following criteria:(1) Was serving as a permanent career civilian firefighter, in good standing, employed by the federal government or contracted to serve at a federal installation or a permanent career firefighter employed by the state or a local government within the state.(2) Has satisfactorily completed all firefighter training required for employment as a permanent career civilian federal, state, or local government firefighter.(3) Was, as a consequence of the closure, downsizing, or realignment of a federal installation, terminated as a permanent career civilian firefighter, or as a consequence of job-elimination, terminated as a permanent career state or local government firefighter, within 36 months prior to the appointment.(c) The appointment authority created by this section shall take precedence over any provision of, or any condition or circumstance arising from a provision of, a charter, ordinance, or resolution that governs employment of firefighters, that would otherwise frustrate the purpose of this section, including, but not limited to, the following:(1) The local government maintains a civil service or merit system governing the appointment of firefighters.(2) The local government has available to it an eligible or regular reemployment list of persons eligible for those appointments.(3) The appointed person is not on any eligible list.(d) A local government may not employ a person pursuant to this section if a special reemployment list is in existence for the firefighter position to be filled.(e) If a local government determines to appoint a person pursuant to this section, it shall give first priority to residents of the jurisdiction, and second priority to residents of the county not residing in the jurisdiction.(f) The seniority, seniority-related privileges, and rank that a permanent career civilian federal, state, or local government firefighter possessed while employed at a federal installation or by the state or a local government shall not be required to be transferred to a position in a local government fire department obtained pursuant to this section.(g) To effectuate the purposes of this section, the California Firefighter Joint Apprenticeship Program may administer, prepare, and circulate to local governments a list of permanent career civilian federal, state, and local government firefighters eligible for appointment pursuant to this section. A permanent career civilian federal, state, or local government firefighter may apply for placement on the list after he or she receives a notice of termination of position or a priority placement notice and shall remain on the list for a period of 36 months.SEC. 5. Section 12300.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:12300.4. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, a recipient who is authorized to receive in-home supportive services pursuant to this article, or Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956, administered by the State Department of Social Services, or waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97, administered by the State Department of Health Care Services, or any combination of these services, shall direct these authorized services, and the authorized services shall be performed by a provider or providers within a workweek and in a manner that complies with the requirements of this section.(b) (1) A workweek is defined as beginning at 12:00 a.m. on Sunday and includes the next consecutive 168 hours, terminating at 11:59 p.m. the following Saturday.(2) A provider of services specified in subdivision (a) shall not work a total number of hours within a workweek that exceeds 66, in accordance with subdivision (d). The total number of hours worked within a workweek by a provider is defined as the sum of the following:(A) All hours worked providing authorized services specified in subdivision (a).(B) Travel time, as defined in subdivision (f), only if federal financial participation is not available to compensate for that travel time. If federal financial participation is available for travel time, as defined in subdivision (f), the travel time shall not be included in the calculation of the total weekly hours worked within a workweek, except for purposes of overtime compensation pursuant to subdivision (c).(3) (A) If the authorized in-home supportive services of a recipient cannot be provided by a single provider as a result of the limitation specified in paragraph (2), it is the responsibility of the recipient to employ an additional provider or providers, as needed, to ensure the provider’s authorized services are provided within that provider’s total weekly authorized hours of services established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12301.1.(B) (i) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section not result in reduced services authorized to recipients of waiver personal care services, as described in subdivision (a).(ii) The State Department of Health Care Services shall work with and assist recipients receiving services pursuant to the Nursing Facility/Acute Hospital Transition and Diversion Waiver or the In-Home Operations Waiver, or their successors, who are at or near their individual cost cap, as that term is used in the waivers, to avoid a reduction in the recipient’s services that may result because of increased overtime pay for providers. As part of this effort, the department shall consider allowing the recipient to exceed the individual cost cap, if appropriate, and authorize exemptions as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 14132.99. The department shall provide timely information to waiver recipients as to the steps that will be taken to implement this clause.(4) (A) A provider shall inform each recipient of the number of hours that the provider is available to work for that recipient, in accordance with this section.(B) A recipient, the recipient’s authorized representative, or any other entity shall not authorize any provider to work hours that exceed the applicable limitation or limitations of this section.(C) A recipient may authorize a provider to work hours in excess of the recipient’s weekly authorized hours established pursuant to Section 12301.1 without notification of the county welfare department, in accordance with both of the following:(i) The authorization does not result in more than 40 hours of authorized services per week being provided.(ii) The authorization does not exceed the recipient’s authorized hours of monthly services pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 12301.1.(5) For providers of in-home supportive services, the State Department of Social Services or a county may terminate the provider from providing services under the IHSS program if a provider continues to violate the limitations of this section on multiple occasions.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, hours worked by a provider in the performance of services described in subdivision (a) or travel time described in subdivision (f) that exceed 40 hours in a workweek shall be compensated at one and one-half times the provider’s hourly wage.(d) A provider of services described in subdivision (a) is subject to all of the following, as applicable to the situation of that provider:(1) (A) A provider who works for one individual recipient of those services shall not work a total number of hours within a workweek that exceeds 66 hours. The provision of these services by that provider to the individual recipient shall not exceed the total weekly hours of the services authorized to that recipient, except as additionally authorized pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b). If multiple providers serve the same recipient, it shall continue to be the responsibility of that recipient or the authorized representative of that recipient to schedule the work of the providers to ensure the authorized services of the recipient are provided in accordance with this section.(B) If a recipient’s weekly authorized hours are adjusted pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 12301.1 and exceed 66 hours, and at the time of adjustment the recipient currently receives all authorized hours of service from one provider, that provider shall be deemed authorized to work the recipient’s county-approved adjusted hours for that week, but only if the additional hours of work, based on the adjustment, do not exceed the total number of hours worked that are compensable at an overtime pay rate that the provider would have been authorized to work in that month if the weekly hours had not been adjusted.(2) A provider of in-home supportive services described in subdivision (a) who serves multiple recipients is not authorized to, and shall not, work more than 66 total hours in a workweek, regardless of the number of recipients for whom the provider provides services authorized by subdivision (a). Providers are subject to the limits of each recipient’s total authorized weekly hours of in-home supportive services described in subdivision (a), except as additionally authorized pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the 66-hour workweek limit described in subdivision (b) does not apply to a provider of in-home supportive services described in subdivision (a), and a recipient of those services may receive those services from a requested provider, if the provider has an approved exemption, as set forth in subparagraph (A) or (B). A provider who has an approved exemption pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) shall not work a total number of hours in excess of 360 hours per month combined for the recipients of in-home supportive services served by that provider and may not exceed a recipient’s monthly authorized hours.(A) A provider is eligible for an exemption if that provider met all of the following on or before January 31, 2016:(i) The provider provided services to two or more recipients of in-home supportive services described in subdivision (a).(ii) The provider lived in the same home as all of the recipients for whom that provider provided services.(iii) The provider is related, biologically, by adoption, or as a foster caregiver, legal guardian, or conservator, to all of the recipients for whom the provider provides services as the recipients’ parent, stepparent, foster or adoptive parent, grandparent, legal guardian, or conservator.(B) A provider is eligible for an exemption if the provider provides services to two or more recipients of in-home supportive services described in subdivision (a), if each recipient for whom the provider provides services has at least one of the following circumstances that puts the recipient at serious risk of placement in out-of-home care if the services could not be provided by that provider:(i) The recipient has complex medical or behavioral needs that must be met by a provider who lives in the same home as the recipient.(ii) The recipient lives in a rural or remote area where available providers are limited, and, as a result, the recipient is unable to hire another provider.(iii) The recipient is unable to hire another provider who speaks the same language as the recipient, resulting in the recipient being unable to direct the recipient’s own care.(C) At the time of assessment or reassessment, the county shall evaluate each recipient to determine if the recipient’s circumstances appear to indicate that the provider for that recipient may be eligible for an exemption described in subparagraph (A) or (B). The county shall then inform those recipients about the potentially applicable exemptions and the process by which they or their provider may apply for the exemption.(D) On a one-time basis upon implementation of this paragraph, the department shall mail an informational notice and an exemption request form to all providers of multiple recipients who may be eligible for an exemption pursuant to subparagraph (B) and to the recipients to whom those providers provide services.(E) (i) The county shall review the requests for consideration for an exemption described in subparagraph (B) pursuant to a process developed by the department with input from counties and stakeholders. The county shall consider whether the denial of an exemption would place a recipient or recipients at serious risk of placement in out-of-home care due to any of the circumstances described in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, of subparagraph (B).(ii) Within 30 days of receiving an application for an exemption described in subparagraph (B) from a provider or from a recipient on behalf of a provider, the county shall mail a written notification letter to the provider and the recipients for whom the provider provides services of its approval or denial of the exemption. If the county denies the exemption, the county shall also explain in the notification letter the reason for the denial and information about the process to request a review by the department, independent of the county’s decision. The county shall use a standardized notification letter, developed by the department in consultation with stakeholders, for purposes of providing the notification letter that is required by this clause.(iii) (I) A provider whose exemption under subparagraph (B) has been denied, or a recipient on behalf of the provider whose exemption under subparagraph (B) has been denied, may request a review by the department, independent of the county’s decision.(II) The department shall develop the review process with input from stakeholders. At a minimum, the review process shall ensure that it provides the provider or the recipient, or that person’s authorized representative, with the opportunity to speak with, and provide written information to, staff of the department conducting the review about how the recipient meets the criteria described in subparagraph (B) and how any alternative services proposed by the county would place the recipient at serious risk of placement in out-of-home care.(III) The department shall consider the information provided by the provider or the recipient, or that person’s authorized representative, and the information provided by the county in reaching its decision.(IV) The department shall mail its written decision within 20 days of the date the provider or the recipient is scheduled to speak with the staff of the department conducting the review, unless the provider or the recipient has requested additional time to submit information and the department has granted that request. The written decision shall inform the provider and the recipients for whom the provider provides services if the exemption is granted or denied. If the department denies the exemption, the department shall also explain in the written decision the reason for the denial.(iv) The county shall record the number of requests for exemptions that are received from providers or recipients on the provider’s behalf and the number of requests approved or denied, and shall submit these numbers to the department. The department shall record the number of requests for the review by the department that are received from providers or recipients and the number of exemptions that are approved or denied through the review process. The numbers by the county and the department shall be posted no later than every three months on the department’s internet website.(e) Recipients and providers shall be informed of the limitations and requirements contained in this section, through notices at intervals and on forms as determined by the State Department of Social Services or the State Department of Health Care Services, as applicable, following consultation with stakeholders.(f) (1) A provider of services described in subdivision (a) shall not engage in travel time in excess of seven hours per week. For purposes of this subdivision, “travel time” means time spent traveling directly from a location where authorized services specified in subdivision (a) are provided to one recipient to another location where authorized services are to be provided to another recipient. A provider shall coordinate hours of work with the provider’s recipients to comply with this section.(2) The hourly wage to compensate a provider for travel time described in this subdivision when the travel is between two counties shall be the hourly wage of the destination county.(3) Travel time, and compensation for that travel time, between a recipient of authorized in-home supportive services specified in subdivision (a) and a recipient of authorized waiver personal care services specified in subdivision (a) shall be attributed to the program authorizing services for the recipient to whom the provider is traveling.(4) Hours spent by a provider while engaged in travel time shall not be deducted from the authorized hours of service of any recipient of services specified in subdivision (a).(5) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services shall issue guidance and processes for travel time between recipients that will assist the provider and recipient to comply with this subdivision. Each county shall provide technical assistance to providers and recipients, as necessary, to implement this subdivision.(g) A provider of authorized in-home supportive services specified in subdivision (a) shall timely submit, deliver, or mail, verified by postmark or request for delivery, a signed payroll timesheet within two weeks after the end of each bimonthly payroll period. Notwithstanding any other law, a provider who submits an untimely payroll timesheet for providing authorized in-home supportive services specified in subdivision (a) shall be paid by the state within 30 days of the receipt of the signed payroll timesheet.(h) This section does not apply to a contract entered into pursuant to Section 12302 for authorized in-home supportive services. Contract rates negotiated pursuant to Section 12302 shall be based on costs consistent with a 40-hour workweek.(i) The state and counties are immune from any liability resulting from implementation of this section.(j) An action authorized under this section that is implemented in a program authorized pursuant to Section 14132.95, 14132.956, or 14132.97 shall be compliant with federal Medicaid requirements, as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services.(k) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any regulatory action.SEC. 6. Section 12301.61 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:12301.61. (a) On or after October 1, 2023, if a public authority or nonprofit consortium established pursuant to Section 12301.6, acting as the employer of record, and the employee organization have not reached an agreement on a bargaining contract with in-home supportive services workers, either party may request mediation, pursuant to Section 3505.2 of the Government Code, which shall be mandatory. If the parties fail to agree on a mediator, the Public Employment Relations Board shall appoint one from the pool described in subdivision (c). The mediation shall be held no more than 15 business days from the date requested by either party.(b) If the parties are unable to effect settlement through mediation, as described in subdivision (a), the parties shall submit their differences to factfinding, pursuant to Sections 3505 and 3505.4 of the Government Code. Alternatively, either party may opt to bypass the mediation process in subdivision (a) and move directly to factfinding.(1) The factfinding panel shall make findings of fact and recommend terms of settlement, which shall be advisory only, within 30 days after the panel is appointed by the Public Employment Relations Board.(2) Within 15 days after the factfinding panel has released its findings of fact and recommended settlement terms, the parties may, by mutual agreement, request postfactfinding mediation consistent with Section 3505.2 of the Government Code. If the parties fail to agree on a mediator, the Public Employment Relations Board shall appoint one from the pool described in subdivision (c).(3) If the parties elect postfactfinding mediation, the findings of fact and recommended settlement terms shall not be made public until the mediation has concluded. If either party declines to elect postfactfinding mediation, the findings of fact and recommended settlement terms shall be made public immediately.(4) Mediation shall be held no more than 15 days from the date requested, and may include, at the mediator’s discretion, the factfinding panel and representatives of both parties. The director, or the director’s designee, shall be available to provide information and expertise, as necessary.(5) The county board of supervisors shall hold a public hearing within 30 days of the factfinding panel’s public release of its findings of fact and recommended settlement terms.(c) The Public Employment Relations Board shall designate a pool of no more than five qualified individuals to serve as mediators or on a factfinding panel. The pool shall consist of individuals with relevant subject matter expertise. The board shall select individuals for the pool in consultation with the department and the affected employers and employee organizations. Priority shall be given to individuals with knowledge of the In-Home Supportive Services program. The board may designate the mediator to serve as the neutral member of the factfinding panel.(d) The costs for the services of the factfinding panel and the mediator shall be equally divided between the parties, and shall include per diem fees, if any, and actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses.(e) If no individual is available to serve as a mediator or factfinder within the timelines specified in this section, the timelines shall be extended until the next mediator or factfinder is available.(f) A county shall be subject to a withholding of 1991 Realignment funds as described in subdivision (h) pursuant to a schedule developed by the Department of Finance and provided to the Controller if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The parties have completed the process described in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.(2) The factfinding panel has issued findings of fact and recommended settlement terms that are more favorable to the employee organization than those proposed by the employer of record described in subdivision (a).(3) The parties do not reach a collective bargaining agreement within 30 days after the release of the factfinding panel’s recommended settlement terms described in paragraph (2). The parties shall make every good faith effort to reach an alternative mutually accepted agreement within this timeframe.(4) The collective bargaining agreement for IHSS providers in the county has expired.(g) The Public Employment Relations Board shall provide written notification to the county and the employee organization within 15 days of determining that the county is subject to a withholding pursuant to subdivision (f). The board shall also notify the Department of Finance and the State Controller of the withholding assessment.(h) The amount of the 1991 Realignment funding withholding pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be equivalent to 10 percent of the county’s prior fiscal year IHSS Maintenance of Effort requirement, as reported by the department, prior to applying any offsets pursuant to Section 12306.17. This withholding shall continue once per fiscal year, each fiscal year, until the county enters into a collective bargaining agreement with the employee organization.SEC. 7. Section 12316.9 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:12316.9. (a) The State Department of Social Services may contract for payrolling or related functions, as necessary, including, but not limited to, the deductions from the wages of providers that are authorized by paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 12301.6 and subdivision (b) of Section 12302.2, subject to the same statutory requirements that apply to the State Controller when making such deductions.(b) In determining whether to contract, as described in subdivision (a), the department may consider potential alternatives, with the intent of avoiding disruptions of payroll and deductions processes and the operations of the In-Home Supportive Services program.SEC. 8. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which amends Section 7926.300 of the Government Code, furthers, within the meaning of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution, the purposes of that constitutional section as it relates to the right of public access to the meetings of local public bodies or the writings of local public officials and local agencies. Pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution, the Legislature makes the following findings:It is in the public interest, and it furthers the purposes of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section (3) of Article I of the California Constitution, to ensure that certain banking information of persons paid by the state to provide in-home supportive and personal care services is provided to the payment processing contractor of the recognized employee organization if those persons have signed a membership agreement authorizing such disclosure.SEC. 9. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique need to consolidate fire protection districts in the County of Humboldt to remove redundancies while continuing fire and emergency response services.SEC. 10. This act is a bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, has been identified as related to the budget in the Budget Bill, and shall take effect immediately.